da: Nåletype for symaskine: Kuglespids (jersey); Coverstitch; Broderi; Hulsøm; Jeans/denim; Læder; Metallic; Microtex (skarp); Overlock; Quiltning; Selvtrådende; Stræk; Stikning; Tredobbelt; Tvilling (dobbelt); Universal; Vinge; Andet
zh-CN: 缝纫机针类型: 圆头针（平纹针织）; 绷缝针; 绣花针; 挑脚针; 牛仔裤/牛仔布针; 皮革针; 金属线针; 极细针（尖头）; 包缝机/锁边机针; 绗缝针; 自穿线针; 弹力布针; 明线针; 三针; 双针; 通用针; 翼针; 其他
vi: Loại kim máy may: Mũi bi (Jersey); Mũi may trần đè; Thêu; Viền rút chỉ; Jeans/Denim; Da; Ánh kim; Microtex (Sắc); Vắt sổ; Chần bông; Tự xỏ chỉ; Co giãn; May chần; Kim ba; Kim đôi; Đa năng; Kim cánh quạt; Khác
ru: Тип иглы швейной машины: Для джерси (с шарообразным острием); Для распошивальных машин; Для вышивания; Для мережки; Для джинсовой ткани/денима; Для кожи; Для металлизированных нитей; Микротекс (острые); Для оверлока; Для квилтинга; Самовдевающиеся; Для эластичных тканей (стрейч); Для отстрочки; Тройная; Двойная; Универсальная; Крылатая (с крылышками); Другое
es: Tipo de aguja para máquinas de coser: Punta de bola (jersey); Punto de recubrimiento; Bordado; Vainica; Jeans/mezclilla; Cuero; Metálico; Microtex (puntiaguda); Overlock/remalladora; Acolchado; Autoenhebrado; Tejidos elásticos; Pespunte; Triple; Gemela (doble); Universal; Aletada; Otra
th: ประเภทเข็มจักรเย็บผ้า: ปลายลูกลื่น (ผ้าเจอร์ซีย์); โคเวอร์สติช; เย็บปักถักร้อย; เย็บฉลุลาย; ยีนส์/เดนิม; หนัง; เมทัลลิก; ไมโครเท็กซ์ (ปลายแหลม); โพ้ง/แซกริม; ควิลท์; สนเข็มอัตโนมัติ; ผ้ายืด; เย็บเดินเส้น; เข็มสาม; เข็มคู่; อเนกประสงค์; เข็มปีก; อื่นๆ
fr: Type d'aiguille de machine à coudre: Pointe à bille (Jersey); Point de recouvrement; Broderie; Point d'ourlet; Jean/denim; Cuir; Métallique; Microtex (pointu); Surjet/surjeteuse; Matelassage; Auto-enfilage; Stretch; Surpiqûre; Triple; Double; Universel; Ailette; Autre
lt-LT: Siuvimo mašinos adatų tipas: Rutulinis smaigalys (trikotažui); Plokščiasiūlėms mašinoms; Siuvinėjimui; Ažūriniam siuvinėjimui; Džinsui; Odai; Metalizuotiems siūlams; Mikroteksui (aštrios); Overlokams; Skiautiniams; Savaime įsiveriančios; Tampriems audiniams; Dekoratyvinėms siūlėms; Trigubos; Dvigubos; Universalios; Sparnuotos (wing); Kita
hu: Varrógép tű típusa: Gömbhegyű (Jersey); Fedőző; Hímző; Azsúrozó; Farmer; Bőr; Fémszálas; Microtex (hegyes); Overlock / Tisztázó; Foltvarró; Önbefűző; Stretch; Dísztűző; Tripla; Iker (dupla); Univerzális; Szárnyas; Egyéb
ja: ミシンニードルタイプ: ボールポイント (ジャージー); カバーステッチ; 刺繍; ヘムステッチ; ジーンズ/デニム; レザー; メタリック; マイクロテックス (シャープ); オーバーロック/ロックミシン; キルティング; セルフスレッディング (糸通し不要); ストレッチ; トップステッチ; トリプル; ツイン (ダブル); ユニバーサル; ウィング; その他
en: Sewing machine needle type: Ballpoint (Jersey); Coverstitch; Embroidery; Hemstitch; Jeans/Denim; Leather; Metallic; Microtex (Sharp); Overlock/Serger; Quilting; Self-threading; Stretch; Topstitch; Triple; Twin (Double); Universal; Wing; Other
ro-RO: Tip de ac pentru mașina de cusut: Vârf sferic (Jerse); Cusătură de acoperire; Broderie; Ajur; Blugi/Denim; Piele; Metalic; Microtex (ascuțit); Surfilare/Overlock; Quilting; Auto-înfilare; Stretch; Tighelire; Triplu; Gemene (duble); Universal; Aripă; Altele
fi: Ompelukoneen neulan tyyppi: Pallokärki (jersey); Peitetikki; Kirjonta; Reikäommelneula; Farkku/denim; Nahka; Metalli; Microtex (terävä); Saumuri; Tilkkutyö; Itselangoittuva; Stretch; Päällitikkaus; Kolmoisneula; Kaksoisneula; Yleisneula; Siipineula; Muu
nl: Type naald naaimachine: Ballpoint (jersey); Coversteek; Borduren; Zoomsteek; Jeans/denim; Leer; Metallic; Microtex (scherp); Overlock/lockmachine; Quilten; Zelfinrijgend; Stretch; Doorstik; Drievoudig; Tweeling (dubbel); Universeel; Vleugel; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de agulha para máquina de costura: Ponta esférica (Jersey); Ponto de recobrimento; Bordado; Bainha aberta; Ganga/denim; Couro; Metálico; Microtex (afiada); Overlock/corte e cose; Quilting; Enfiamento automático; Stretch; Pesponto; Tripla; Gémea (dupla); Universal; Espadão; Outro
cs: Typ jehly šicího stroje: Kulová špička (Jersey); Coverlock; Vyšívací; Zoubkovací; Na džínovinu; Na kůži; Na metalické nitě; Microtex (ostré); Overlockové; Prošívací (quilting); Samonavlékací; Na streč; Na štepování (topstitch); Trojité; Dvojité; Univerzální; S křidélkem; Jiné
it: Tipo di ago per macchina da cucire: A sfera (Jersey); Punto copertura; Ricamo; Punto a giorno; Jeans/Denim; Pelle; Metallizzati; Microtex (Affilato); Overlock/Tagliacuci; Quilting; Auto-infilante; Stretch; Impuntura; Triplo; Gemello (Doppio); Universale; A lancia; Altro
sk-SK: Typ ihiel pre šijací stroj: Guľatý hrot (džersej); Krycí steh; Vyšívacie; Ažúrové; Džínsy/denim; Koža; Metalické; Microtex (ostré); Overlock; Na quilting; Samonavliekacie; Streč; Na vrchné prešívanie; Trojité; Dvojité; Univerzálne; Krídelkové; Iné
tr: Dikiş makinesi iğne tipi: Yuvarlak uçlu (Jarse); Reçme; Nakış; Ajur; Kot/Denim; Deri; Metalik; Microtex (Sivri uç); Overlok; Kapitone; Kendinden iplik geçirmeli; Esnek; Üst dikiş; Üçlü; Çift (İkili); Evrensel; Kanat; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип игла за шевна машина: Със сферичен връх (трикотаж); Покривен бод; Бродерия; За ажурен шев (Hemstitch); Дънки/деним; Кожа; Метализиран (за метални конци); Microtex (Остър); Оверлог; Капитониране; Самовдяваща; Еластична тъкан; Декоративен шев; Тройна; Двойна (Twin); Универсална; С крилца (Wing); Друго
nb: Nåletype for symaskin: Kulespiss (jersey); Dekksøm; Broderi; Hullsøm; Jeans/denim; Skinn; Metallisk; Microtex (spiss); Overlock; Quilting; Selvtrædende; Stretch; Stikning; Trippel; Tvilling (dobbel); Universal; Vinge; Annet
el: Τύπος βελόνας ραπτομηχανής: Στρογγυλή μύτη (Ζέρσεϊ); Πλακοραφή; Κεντήματος; Αζούρ; Τζιν/Denim; Δέρμα; Μεταλλικό; Microtex (Αιχμηρή); Κοπτοράπτη; Καπιτονέ; Αυτοπεραζόμενη; Για ελαστικά (Stretch); Εξώγαζο; Τριπλή; Δίδυμη (Διπλή); Γενικής χρήσης; Φτερωτή (Wing); Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta igle za šivalni stroj: Kroglična (Jersey); Prekrivni šiv; Za vezenje; Za robni šiv; Kavbojke/jeans; Usnje; Za kovinske niti; Microtex (ostra); Overlock/Serger; Za prešivanje; Samovdevalna; Raztegljivo; Za okrasni šiv; Trojna; Dvojna; Univerzalna; Krilata; Drugo
pt-BR: Máquina de costura, tipo de agulha: Ponta esférica (Jersey); Galoneira; Bordado; Ponto ajour (Bainha aberta); Jeans/Denim; Couro; Metálica; Microtex (Afiada); Overlock; Quilting; Fácil de passar; Stretch; Pesponto; Tripla; Dupla (Twin); Universal; Ponta espada (Wing); Outra
ko: 재봉틀 바늘 유형: 볼포인트(저지); 커버스티치; 자수; 헴스티치; 청바지/데님; 가죽; 메탈릭; 마이크로텍스(샤프); 오버록/오버록 미싱; 퀼팅; 자동 실 꿰기; 스트레치; 톱스티치; 트리플; 트윈(더블); 범용; 윙; 기타
de: Art der Nähmaschinennadeln: Kugelspitze (Jersey); Coverstich; Stickerei; Hohlsaum; Jeans/Denim; Leder; Metallic; Microtex (spitz); Overlock; Quilten; Selbsteinfädelnd; Stretch; Topstitch; Drillingsnadel; Zwillingsnadel (doppelt); Universal; Flügelnadel; Andere
pl: Typ igły w maszynie do szycia: Z kulką (Dżersej); Coverstitch; Do haftu; Do mereżki; Do jeansu; Do skóry; Do nici metalizowanych; Microtex (Ostra); Owerlok; Do pikowania; Samonawlekająca; Do materiałów elastycznych; Do stebnowania; Potrójna; Podwójna; Uniwersalna; Skrzydełkowa; Inne
zh-TW: 縫紉機用針類型: 圓珠針 (針織布); 繃縫針; 刺繡針; 抽邊縫針; 牛仔褲/丹寧布針; 皮革針; 金屬線專用針; Microtex (銳尖針); 包縫/拷克針; 壓線針; 盲人針 (免穿線針); 彈性布料針; 壓線針; 三針; 雙針; 通用針; 翼針; 其他
sv: Typ av nål för symaskin: Kulspets (Jersey); Täcksöm; Broderi; Hålsöm; Jeans/denim; Läder; Metallic; Microtex (vass); Overlock; Quiltning; Självträdande; Stretch; Sticksöm; Trippel; Tvilling (dubbel); Universal; Vingnål; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta igle šivaćeg stroja: Kugličasta (džersej); Za pokrivni bod; Za vez; Za šupljiku; Za traper (jeans); Za kožu; Za metalik konac; Microtex (oštra); Overlock; Za prošivanje (quilting); S automatskim uvlačenjem konca; Za rastezljive materijale; Za gornji šav; Trostruka; Dvostruka; Univerzalna; S krilcima; Ostalo